Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5513.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-10-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-7. Temporary driver’s permit — Persons over the age of eighteen (18).
The division of motor vehicles may in its discretion issue a temporary driver’s permit to an
applicant for a full operator’s license who has attained the age of eighteen (18). A temporary
driver’s permit shall permit the applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the division of motor
vehicles is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the applicant’s
right to receive a full operator’s license. The temporary driver's permit shall be held for no less than
thirty (30) days prior to the applicant being eligible to take a road test. The temporary driver’s
permit must be in the applicant’s immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle, and it shall
be invalid when the applicant’s license has been issued or for good cause has been refused. The
temporary driver's permit shall expire, unless sooner cancelled, revoked, or suspended, one year
following the date of issuance, and may only be renewed for one additional year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001264
========